Maryland, session 2026, HB1412.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Natural Resources
4–807.
(a) (1) Any person desiring to engage in the business of picking, canning, or
packing crabs, except a person picking and selling crab meat for local family trade, first
shall obtain a license. “Local family trade” means the selling of picked crab meat directly
to the consumer by the picker, with the meat being picked entirely from crabs harvested by
the picker or family of the picker. Nothing in this [section] SUBSECTION exempts persons
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from exist in g l aw . *hb1412*

HOUSE BILL 1412
engaged in picking, canning, or packing crabs from the applicable Maryland Department
of Health requirements.
[(b)] (2) This [section] SUBSECTION does not require any person licensed to
catch crabs to obtain a license to sell the crabs caught or require a license for retail crab
sellers who purchase crabs from a person licensed under this [section] SUBSECTION.
(B) (1) IN THIS SUBSECTION, “MOBILE SEAFOOD VENDOR” MEANS A
PERSON WHO SELLS OR OFFERS FOR SALE ANY SEAFOOD:
(I) WHILE OUTDOORS ON FOOT;
(II) FROM ANY VEHICLE OR CONVEYANCE, WHETHER OR NOT
THE VEHICLE OR CONVEYANCE IS IN OPERATING CONDITION; OR
(III) FROM ANY TENT, TEMPORARY STAND, ROADSIDE STAND,
ROADSIDE MARKET, OR OTHER VENUE THAT IS NOT AN ESTABLISHED PLACE OF
BUSINESS.
(2) A PERSON WHO IS LICENSED TO CATCH CRABS AND DOES NOT
HOLD A SEAFOOD DEALER LICENSE MAY NOT SELL COOKED HARD OR SOFT CRABS
OR CRAB MEAT HARVESTED BY THE LICENSE HOLDER.
(3) A MOBILE SEAFOOD VENDOR:
(I) SHALL OBTAIN A SEAFOOD DEALER LICENSE;
(II) MAY NOT PURCHASE COOKED HARD OR SOFT CRABS OR
CRAB MEAT FROM A PERSON LICENSED TO CATCH CRABS WHO DOES NOT HOLD A
SEAFOOD DEALER LICENSE; AND
(III) SHALL COMPLY WITH APPLICABLE MARYLAND
DEPARTMENT OF HEALTH REQUIREMENTS.
(4) A SEAFOOD DEALER:
(I) MAY NOT PURCHASE COOKED HARD OR SOFT CRABS OR
CRAB MEAT FROM A PERSON LICENSED TO CATCH CRABS WHO DOES NOT HOLD A
SEAFOOD DEALER LICENSE; AND
(II) SHALL COMPLY WITH APPLICABLE MARYLAND
DEPARTMENT OF HEALTH REQUIREMENTS.

HOUSE BILL 1412 3
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect June
1, 2026.